Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 14 Suppression of Criminally Operated Businesses

7-14-1.
Forfeiture of charter and revocation of permit.

The attorney general is authorized to institute civil proceedings in the superior court to forfeit the charter of any corporation organized under the laws of this state and to revoke the permit authorizing any foreign corporation to carry on business in this state, when:

Any of the corporate officers or any other person controlling the management or operation of the corporation, with the knowledge of the president and a majority of the board of directors or under such circumstances wherein the president and a majority of the directors should have knowledge, is a person engaged in organized gambling, organized traffic in narcotics, organized extortion, organized bribery, organized embezzlement, or organized prostitution, or who is connected directly or indirectly with organizations, syndicates, or criminal societies engaging in those activities; or

A director, officer, employee, agent, or stockholder acting for, through, or on behalf of the corporation has, in conducting the corporation’s affairs, purposely engaged in a persistent course of gambling, unlawful traffic in narcotics, extortion, embezzlement, intimidation and coercion, bribery, prostitution, or other criminal conduct with the knowledge of the president and a majority of the board of directors or under circumstances where the president and a majority of the directors should have knowledge, with the intent to compel or induce other persons, firms, and corporations to deal with the corporation or to engage in any criminal conduct; and

For the prevention of future illegal conduct of the same character, the public interest requires the charter of the corporation to be forfeited and the corporation to be dissolved or the permit to be revoked.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 236, § 1.

7-14-2.
Enjoining operations of a business.

The attorney general is authorized to institute civil proceedings in the superior court to enjoin the operation of any business other than a corporation, including a partnership, limited partnership, unincorporated association, joint venture, or sole proprietorship, when:

Any person in control of the business, who may be a partner in a partnership, a participant in a joint venture, the owner of a sole proprietorship, an employee or agent of the business, or a person who, in fact, exercises control over the operations of the business, has, in conducting its business affairs, purposely engaged in a persistent course of gambling, unlawful traffic in narcotics, extortion, embezzlement, intimidation, bribery, prostitution, crimes against nature, or other illegal conduct with the intent to compel or induce other persons, firms, or corporations to deal with the business or engage in any illegal conduct; and

That for the prevention of future illegal conduct of the same character, the public interest requires the operation of the business to be enjoined.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 236, § 1.

7-14-3.
Institution and conduct of proceedings.

The proceedings authorized by §

7-14-1

may be instituted against a corporation in any county in which it is doing business, and the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Rhode Island rules of civil procedure and the applicable rules of court. The proceedings are deemed additional to any other proceeding authorized by law for the purpose of forfeiting the charter of a corporation or revoking the permit of a foreign corporation.

The proceedings authorized by §

7-14-2

may be instituted against a business other than a corporation in any county in which it is doing business, and the proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Rhode Island rules of civil procedure and the applicable rules of court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 236, § 1.

7-14-4.
Severability.

It is declared to be the legislative intent that, if any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or provision of this chapter is held to be invalid, the remainder of the chapter is not affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 236, § 2.